vi: Hình dạng lỗ trung tâm: Hình nơ; Hình elip; Sao năm cánh; Lỗ khóa; Hình trái xoan; Chữ nhật; Tròn; Sao bảy cánh; Sao sáu cánh; Hình chữ V; Khác
fr: Forme du trou central: En nœud papillon; Elliptique; Étoile à cinq branches; Trou de serrure; Oval; Rectangle; Rond; Étoile à sept branches; Étoile à six branches; En forme de Y; Autre
en: Center hole shape: Bow-tie; Elliptical; Five-point star; Keyhole; Oval; Rectangle; Round; Seven-point star; Six-point star; Y-shaped; Other
ja: 中心穴の形状: ボウタイ; 楕円; 五芒星; 鍵穴; 楕円形; 長方形; ラウンド; 七芒星; 六芒星; Y型; その他
pt-BR: Formato do furo central: Gravata borboleta; Elíptico; Estrela de cinco pontas; Encaixe tipo fechadura; Oval; Retângulo; Redondo; Estrela de sete pontas; Estrela de seis pontas; Em forma de Y; Outro
tr: Merkez delik şekli: Kelebek; Eliptik; Beş köşeli yıldız; Anahtar deliği; Oval; Dikdörtgen; Yuvarlak; Yedi köşeli yıldız; Altı köşeli yıldız; Y şekilli; Diğer
ru: Форма центрального отверстия: «Бабочка»; Эллиптическое; Пятиконечная звезда; Замочная скважина; Овальное; Прямоугольное; Круглое; Семиконечная звезда; Шестиконечная звезда; У-образное; Другое
da: Centerhuls form: Bow-tie; Elliptisk; Femtakket stjerne; Nøglehul; Oval; Rektangel; Rund; Syvtakket stjerne; Sekstakket stjerne; Y-formet; Andet
it: Forma del foro centrale: A farfalla; Ellittico; Stella a cinque punte; Buco della serratura; Ovale; Rettangolo; Rotondo; Stella a sette punte; Stella a sei punte; A forma di Y; Altro
pl: Kształt otworu centralnego: Motylkowy; Eliptyczny; Gwiazda pięcioramienna; Otwór typu „dziurka od klucza”; Owalny; Prostokątny; Okrągłe; Gwiazda siedmioramienna; Gwiazda sześcioramienna; W kształcie litery Y; Pozostałe
lt-LT: Centrinės angos forma: Peteliškės formos; Elipsės formos; Penkiakampė žvaigždė; Rakto skylutė; Ovalas; Stačiakampis; Apvali; Septynių taškų žvaigždė; Šešiakampė žvaigždė; Y formos; Kita
ro-RO: Forma orificiului central: În formă de papion; Eliptică; Stea cu cinci colțuri; Gaură de cheie; Ovală; Dreptunghiulară; Rotundă; Stea cu șapte colțuri; Stea cu șase colțuri; În formă de Y; Altele
hu: Középső lyuk formája: Csokornyakkendő; Elliptikus; Ötágú csillag; Kulcslyuk; Ovális; Szögletes; Kerek; Hétágú csillag; Hatágú csillag; Y alakú; Egyéb
sk-SK: Tvar stredového otvoru: Motýlik; Eliptický; Päťcípa hviezda; Kľúčová dierka; Oválny; Obdĺžnikový; Okrúhly; Sedemcípa hviezda; Šesťcípa hviezda; V tvare Y; Iné
nb: Senterhull-form: Sløyfe; Elliptisk; Fempunktsstjerne; Nøkkelhull; Oval; Rektangel; Rund; Syvpunktsstjerne; Sekspunktsstjerne; Y-formet; Annet
ko: 중앙 장착 구멍 형태: 나비넥타이형; 타원형; 5각 별; 열쇠구멍; 타원형; 직사각형; 라운드; 7각 별; 6각 별; Y자형; 기타
el: Σχήμα κεντρικής οπής: Τύπου bow-tie; Ελλειπτικό; Αστέρι πέντε ακτίνων; Οπή τύπου κλειδαρότρυπας; Οβάλ; Παραλληλόγραμμο; Στρογγυλό; Αστέρι επτά ακτίνων; Αστέρι έξι ακτίνων; Σε σχήμα Y; Άλλο
nl: Vorm van middengat: Vlinder; Elliptisch; Vijfpuntige ster; Sleutelgat; Ovaal; Rechthoek; Rond; Zevenpuntige ster; Zespuntige ster; Y-vormig; Overig
zh-CN: 中心孔形状: 蝴蝶结形; 椭圆形; 五角星形; 钥匙孔型; 卵形; 长方形; 圆形; 七角星形; 六角星形; Y 形; 其他
sv: Centrumhålets form: Fluga; Elliptisk; Femuddig stjärna; Nyckelhål; Oval; Rektangel; Rund; Sjuuddig stjärna; Sexuddig stjärna; Y-formad; Övrigt
pt-PT: Forma do furo central: Laço; Elíptico; Estrela de cinco pontas; Fechadura; Oval; Retângulo; Redondo; Estrela de sete pontas; Estrela de seis pontas; Em forma de Y; Outro
cs: Tvar středového otvoru: Motýlkový; Eliptický; Pěticípá hvězda; Klíčová dírka; Oválný; Obdélníkový; Kulatý; Sedmicípá hvězda; Šesticípá hvězda; Ve tvaru Y; Jiný
th: รูปทรงรูตรงกลาง: ทรงโบว์ไท; ทรงรี; แบบดาวห้าแฉก; แบบรูกุญแจ; รูปไข่; สี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงกลม; แบบดาวเจ็ดแฉก; แบบดาวหกแฉก; รูปตัว Y; อื่นๆ
de: Form der Mittelbohrung: Bow-Tie; Elliptisch; Fünf-Punkte-Stern; Schlüsselloch; Oval; Rechteck; Kreis; Sieben-Punkte-Stern; Sechs-Punkte-Stern; Y-förmig; Sonstiges
es: Forma del orificio central: Arqueado; Elíptico; Estrella de cinco puntas; Ojo de cerradura; Ovalado; Rectángulo; Redondo; Estrella de siete puntas; Estrella de seis puntas; En forma de Y; Otros
fi: Keskireiän muoto: Rusetti; Ellipsi; Viisisakarainen tähti; Avaimenreikä; Soikea; Suorakulmio; Pyöreä; Seitsemänsakarainen tähti; Kuusisakarainen tähti; Y:n muotoinen; Muu
sl-SI: Oblika sredinske luknje: Metuljček; Eliptičen; Petkraka zvezda; Ključavnična luknja; Ovalno; Pravokotna; Okrogel; Sedemkraka zvezda; Šestkraka zvezda; V obliki črke Y; Druga
zh-TW: 中心孔形狀: 領結形; 橢圓形; 五角星形; 鎖孔; 橢圓形; 長方形; 圓形; 七角星形; 六角星; Y 形; 其他
hr-HR: Oblik središnjeg otvora: U obliku leptir-mašne; Eliptična; Petokraka zvijezda; Ključanica; Ovalno; Pravokutni; Okrugla; Sedmokraka zvijezda; Šestokraka zvijezda; U obliku slova Y; Ostalo
bg-BG: Форма на централния отвор: Тип „папийонка“; Елипсовидно; Петолъчна звезда; Ключалка; Овално; Правоъгълник; Кръгло; Седемлъчева звезда; Шестолъчка; Y-образно; Друго